Nevada, session 83, SB441.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 706A.075 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
706A.075 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the provisions of this chapter do not exempt any person from any
law governing the operation of a motor vehicle upon the highways
of this State.
2. A transportation network company which holds a valid
permit issued by the Authority pursuant to this chapter, a driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider who has entered into an
agreement with such a company and a vehicle or monitored
autonomous vehicle operated by such a driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider are exempt from:
(a) The provisions of chapter 704 of NRS relating to public
utilities; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 706.88396 , 706A.160
and 706A.163, the provisions of chapter 706 of NRS,
 to the extent that the services provided by the company, driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider are within the scope of the
permit.
3. The provisions of this chapter relating to monitored
autonomous vehicles and monitored autonomous vehicle providers
do not apply to an autonomous vehicle network company which has
been issued a permit pursuant to NRS 706B.130 or to a fully
autonomous vehicle operated by such a company.
Sec. 2. NRS 706A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706A.110 1. A transportation network company shall not
engage in business in this State unless the company holds a valid
permit issued by the Authority pursuant to this chapter.
2. A driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider shall not
provide transportation services unless the company with which the
driver or monitored autonomous vehicle provider is affiliated holds
a valid permit issued by the Authority pursuant to this chapter.
3. The Authority is authorized and empowered to regulate,
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, all transportation network
companies, drivers and monitored autonomous vehicle providers
who operate or wish to operate within this State. Except as
otherwise provided in NRS 706.88396 , 706A.160 and 706A.163,
the Authority shall not apply any provision of chapter 706 of NRS
to a transportation network company, driver or monitored
-
*SB441*

– 3 –
autonomous vehicle provider who operates within the provisions of
this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
Sec. 3. NRS 706A.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706A.160 1. A transportation network company may enter
into an agreement with one or more drivers to receive connections to
potential passengers from the company in exchange for the payment
of a fee by the driver to the company.
2. Before a transportation network company allows a person to
be connected to potential passengers using the digital network or
software application service of the company pursuant to an
agreement with the company, except for a contract entered into
pursuant to NRS 706A.163, the [company] person must:
(a) [Require the person to submit an application to the company,
which must include, without limitation:
(1) The name, age and address of the applicant.
(2) A copy of the driver’s license of the applicant.
(3) A record of the driving history of the applicant.
(4) A description of the motor vehicle of the applicant and a
copy of the motor vehicle registration.
(5) Proof that the applicant has complied with the
requirements of NRS 485.185.] Submit to the Authority any
application, information and fees in the same manner as required
pursuant to NRS 706.462 to 706.4626, inclusive, and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, for a person to drive a
motor vehicle for a taxicab motor carrier; and
(b) [At the time of application and not less than once every 3
years thereafter, conduct or contract with a third party to conduct an
investigation of the criminal history of the applicant, which must
include, without limitation:
(1) A review of a commercially available database
containing criminal records from each state which are validated
using a search of the primary source of each record.
(2) A search of a database containing the information
available in the sex offender registry maintained by each state.
(c) At the time of application and not less than once every year
thereafter, obtain and review a complete record of the driving
history of the applicant.] Be issued a driver’s permit by the
Authority.
3. A transportation network company may enter into an
agreement with a driver if [:] the driver:
(a) [The applicant is at least 19 years of age.] Is issued a
driver’s permit pursuant to subsection 2; and
(b) [The applicant possesses a valid driver’s license issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles unless the applicant is exempt
-
*SB441*

– 4 –
from the requirement to obtain a Nevada driver’s license pursuant to
NRS 483.240.
(c) The applicant provides proof that the motor vehicle operated
by him or her is registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles
unless the applicant is exempt from the requirement to register the
motor vehicle in this State pursuant to NRS 482.385.
(d) The applicant provides proof that the motor vehicle operated
by him or her is operated and maintained in compliance with all
applicable federal, state and local laws.
(e) The applicant provides proof that he or she currently is in
compliance with the provisions of NRS 485.185.
(f) In the 3 years immediately preceding the date on which the
application is submitted, the applicant has not been found guilty of
three or more violations of the motor vehicle laws of this State or
any traffic ordinance of any city or town, the penalty prescribed for
which is a misdemeanor.
(g) In the 3 years immediately preceding the date on which the
application is submitted, the applicant has not been found guilty of
any violation of the motor vehicle laws of this State or any traffic
ordinance of any city or town, the penalty prescribed for which is a
gross misdemeanor or felony.
(h) In the 7 years immediately preceding the date on which the
application is submitted, the applicant has not been found guilty of
any violation of federal, state or local law prohibiting driving or
being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance.
(i) In the 7 years immediately preceding the date on which the
application is submitted, the applicant has not been found guilty of
any crime involving an act of terrorism, an act of violence, a sexual
offense, fraud, theft, damage to property of another or the use of a
motor vehicle in the commission of a felony.
(j) The name of the applicant does not appear in the database
searched pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of
subsection 2.] Complies with the provisions of chapter 706 of NRS,
and any regulations adopted thereto, relating to the application,
investigation and qualifications of persons who drive a motor
vehicle for a taxicab motor carrier.
4. A driver shall, not later than 6 months after a transportation
network company allows the driver to be connected to potential
passengers using the digital network or software application service
of the company pursuant to an agreement with the company and
annually thereafter, on or before the anniversary date of that
agreement, provide to the company verification that the driver holds
a valid state business license pursuant to chapter 76 of NRS. Such
verification may consist of the business identification number
-
*SB441*

– 5 –
assigned by the Secretary of State to the driver upon compliance
with the provisions of chapter 76 of NRS.
5. A transportation network company shall terminate an
agreement with any driver [who:
(a) Fails to submit to the transportation network company a
change in his or her address, driver’s license or motor vehicle
registration within 30 days after the date of the change.
(b) Fails to immediately report to the transportation network
company any change in his or her driving history or criminal
history.
(c) Refuses to authorize the transportation network company to
obtain and review an updated complete record of his or her driving
history not less than once each year and an investigation of his or
her criminal history not less than once every 3 years.
(d) Is determined by the transportation network company to be
ineligible for an agreement pursuant to subsection 3 on the basis of
any updated information received by the transportation network
company.
(e) Fails] upon notification from the Authority that the driver
has failed to comply with the provisions of [subsection 4.] chapter
706 of NRS relating to the application, investigation and
qualifications of persons who drive a motor vehicle for a taxicab
motor carrier.
6. The Authority shall adopt any regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
7. As used in this section, “taxicab motor carrier” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706.126.
H
-
*SB441*